California, session 20252026, AB2426.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Chapter 22.2.10 (commencing with Section 22589.7) is added to Division 8 of the Business and Professions Code, to read: CHAPTER 22.2.10. Children’s Digital Educational Content22589.7. This chapter shall be known, and may be cited, as the California Children’s Digital Educational Content Act of 2026.22589.7.1. For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:(a) “Covered platform” means a platform that has annual gross revenues in excess of one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) in any calendar year.(b) “Educational children’s content” means original video programming that is primarily designed for children 2 to 16 years of age, inclusive, is socially, civically, or core-curriculum educational in nature, and complies with the standards for children’s educational and informational programming adopted by the Federal Communications Commission.(c) “Minor” means an individual under 18 years of age.(d) “Platform” means an advertising-supported, nonsubscription digital content or social media service that distributes video content to users in California, whether the content is user generated or professionally produced.(e) “Walled garden” means a clearly designated and easily accessible section of a platform that is dedicated exclusively to educational children’s content.22589.7.2. A covered platform shall establish and maintain a walled garden that meets all of the following requirements:(a) Contains no fewer than four hours of children’s digital educational content at all times.(b) Be free from targeted advertising.(c) Provide age-appropriate navigation and safety features.(d) Display content consistent with Federal Communications Commission guidelines for children’s programming.(e) Be accessible to minors without requiring account creation.22589.7.3. (a) By April 1, 2027, and annually thereafter, a covered platform shall submit a compliance report to the Department of Consumer Affairs covering the preceding calendar year. The report shall include all of the following:(1) The titles and total hours of educational children’s content maintained in the walled garden during the reporting period.(2) A description of the safety features and navigation controls implemented in the walled garden.(3) Evidence of compliance with the requirements of this chapter.(b) The Department of Consumer Affairs may conduct audits to verify compliance with this chapter.22589.7.4. (a) A covered platform that violates this chapter shall be liable for an administrative penalty not to exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) per day for each day the violation continues.(b) The Department of Consumer Affairs may adopt regulations to implement the provisions of this chapter.SEC. 2. The provisions of this chapter are severable. If any provision of this chapter or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.SECTION 1.Section 1770 of the Civil Code is amended to read:1770.(a)The unfair methods of competition and unfair or deceptive acts or practices listed in this subdivision undertaken by any person in a transaction intended to result or that results in the sale or lease of goods or services to any consumer are unlawful:(1)Passing off goods or services as those of another.(2)Misrepresenting the source, sponsorship, approval, or certification of goods or services.(3)Misrepresenting the affiliation, connection, or association with, or certification by, another.(4)Using deceptive representations or designations of geographic origin in connection with goods or services.(5)Representing that goods or services have sponsorship, approval, characteristics, ingredients, uses, benefits, or quantities that they do not have or that a person has a sponsorship, approval, status, affiliation, or connection that the person does not have.(6)Representing that goods are original or new if they have deteriorated unreasonably or are altered, reconditioned, reclaimed, used, or secondhand.(7)Representing that goods or services are of a particular standard, quality, or grade, or that goods are of a particular style or model, if they are of another.(8)Disparaging the goods, services, or business of another by false or misleading representation of fact.(9)Advertising goods or services with intent not to sell them as advertised.(10)Advertising goods or services with intent not to supply reasonably expectable demand, unless the advertisement discloses a limitation of quantity.(11)Advertising furniture without clearly indicating that it is unassembled if that is the case.(12)Advertising the price of unassembled furniture without clearly indicating the assembled price of that furniture if the same furniture is available assembled from the seller.(13)Making false or misleading statements of fact concerning reasons for, existence of, or amounts of, price reductions.(14)Representing that a transaction confers or involves rights, remedies, or obligations that it does not have or involve, or that are prohibited by law.(15)Representing that a part, replacement, or repair service is needed when it is not.(16)Representing that the subject of a transaction has been supplied in accordance with a previous representation when it has not.(17)Representing that the consumer will receive a rebate, discount, or other economic benefit, if the earning of the benefit is contingent on an event to occur subsequent to the consummation of the transaction.(18)Misrepresenting the authority of a salesperson, representative, or agent to negotiate the final terms of a transaction with a consumer.(19)Inserting an unconscionable provision in the contract.(20)Advertising that a product is being offered at a specific price plus a specific percentage of that price unless (A) the total price is set forth in the advertisement, which may include, but is not limited to, shelf tags, displays, and media advertising, in a size larger than any other price in that advertisement, and (B) the specific price plus a specific percentage of that price represents a markup from the seller’s costs or from the wholesale price of the product. This subdivision shall not apply to in-store advertising by businesses that are open only to members or cooperative organizations organized pursuant to Division 3 (commencing with Section 12000) of Title 1 of the Corporations Code if more than 50 percent of purchases are made at the specific price set forth in the advertisement.(21)Selling or leasing goods in violation of Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 1797.8) of Title 1.7.(22)(A)Disseminating an unsolicited prerecorded message by telephone without an unrecorded, natural voice first informing the person answering the telephone of the name of the caller or the organization being represented, and either the address or the telephone number of the caller, and without obtaining the consent of that person to listen to the prerecorded message.(B)This subdivision does not apply to a message disseminated to a business associate, customer, or other person having an established relationship with the person or organization making the call, to a call for the purpose of collecting an existing obligation, or to any call generated at the request of the recipient.(23)(A)The home solicitation, as defined in subdivision (h) of Section 1761, of a consumer who is a senior citizen where a loan or assessment is made encumbering the primary residence of that consumer for purposes of paying for home improvements and where the transaction is part of a pattern or practice in violation of any of the following:(i)Subsection (h) or (i) of Section 1639 of Title 15 of the United States Code.(ii)Paragraph (1), (2), or (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 226.34 of Title 12 of the Code of Federal Regulations.(iii)Section 22684, 22685, 22686, or 22687 of the Financial Code.(iv)Section 5898.16, 5898.17, 5913, 5922, 5923, 5924, 5925, 5926, or 5940 of the Streets and Highways Code.(B)A third party shall not be liable under this subdivision unless (i) there was an agency relationship between the party who engaged in home solicitation and the third party, or (ii) the third party had actual knowledge of, or participated in, the unfair or deceptive transaction. A third party who is a holder in due course under a home solicitation transaction shall not be liable under this subdivision.(24)(A)Charging or receiving an unreasonable fee to prepare, aid, or advise a prospective applicant, applicant, or recipient in the procurement, maintenance, or securing of public social services.(B)For purposes of this paragraph:(i)“Public social services” means those activities and functions of state and local government administered or supervised by the State Department of Health Care Services, the State Department of Public Health, or the State Department of Social Services, and involved in providing aid or services, or both, including health care services, and medical assistance, to those persons who, because of their economic circumstances or social condition, are in need of that aid or those services and may benefit from them.(ii)“Public social services” also includes activities and functions administered or supervised by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs or the California Department of Veterans Affairs involved in providing aid or services, or both, to veterans, including pension benefits.(iii)“Unreasonable fee” means a fee that is exorbitant and disproportionate to the services performed. Factors to be considered, if appropriate, in determining the reasonableness of a fee, are based on the circumstances existing at the time of the service and shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:(I)The time and effort required.(II)The novelty and difficulty of the services.(III)The skill required to perform the services.(IV)The nature and length of the professional relationship.(V)The experience, reputation, and ability of the person providing the services.(C)This paragraph shall not apply to attorneys licensed to practice law in California, who are subject to the California Rules of Professional Conduct and to the mandatory fee arbitration provisions of Article 13 (commencing with Section 6200) of Chapter 4 of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code, when the fees charged or received are for providing representation in administrative agency appeal proceedings or court proceedings for purposes of procuring, maintaining, or securing public social services on behalf of a person or group of persons.(25)(A)Advertising or promoting any event, presentation, seminar, workshop, or other public gathering regarding veterans’ benefits or entitlements that does not include the following statement in the same type size and font as the term “veteran” or any variation of that term:(i)“I am not authorized to file an initial application for Veterans’ Aid and Attendance benefits on your behalf, or to represent you before the Board of Veterans’ Appeals within the United States Department of Veterans Affairs in any proceeding on any matter, including an application for those benefits. It would be illegal for me to accept a fee for preparing that application on your behalf.” The requirements of this clause do not apply to a person licensed to act as an agent or attorney in proceedings before the Agency of Original Jurisdiction and the Board of Veterans’ Appeals within the United States Department of Veterans Affairs when that person is offering those services at the advertised event.(ii)The statement in clause (i) shall also be disseminated, both orally and in writing, at the beginning of any event, presentation, seminar, workshop, or public gathering regarding veterans’ benefits or entitlements.(B)Advertising or promoting any event, presentation, seminar, workshop, or other public gathering regarding veterans’ benefits or entitlements that is not sponsored by, or affiliated with, the United States Department of Veterans Affairs, the California Department of Veterans Affairs, or any other congressionally chartered or recognized organization of honorably discharged members of the Armed Forces of the United States, or any of their auxiliaries that does not include the following statement, in the same type size and font as the term “veteran” or the variation of that term:“This event is not sponsored by, or affiliated with, the United States Department of Veterans Affairs, the California Department of Veterans Affairs, or any other congressionally chartered or recognized organization of honorably discharged members of the Armed Forces of the United States, or any of their auxiliaries. None of the insurance products promoted at this sales event are endorsed by those organizations, all of which offer free advice to veterans about how to qualify and apply for benefits.”(i)The statement in this subparagraph shall be disseminated, both orally and in writing, at the beginning of any event, presentation, seminar, workshop, or public gathering regarding veterans’ benefits or entitlements.(ii)The requirements of this subparagraph shall not apply in a case where the United States Department of Veterans Affairs, the California Department of Veterans Affairs, or other congressionally chartered or recognized organization of honorably discharged members of the Armed Forces of the United States, or any of their auxiliaries have granted written permission to the advertiser or promoter for the use of its name, symbol, or insignia to advertise or promote the event, presentation, seminar, workshop, or other public gathering.(26)Advertising, offering for sale, or selling a financial product that is illegal under state or federal law, including any cash payment for the assignment to a third party of the consumer’s right to receive future pension or veteran’s benefits.(27)Representing that a product is made in California by using a Made in California label created pursuant to Section 12098.10 of the Government Code, unless the product complies with Section 12098.10 of the Government Code.(28)(A)Failing to include either of the following in a solicitation by a covered person, or an entity acting on behalf of a covered person, to a consumer for a consumer financial product or service:(i)The name of the covered person, and, if applicable, the entity acting on behalf of the covered person, and relevant contact information, including a mailing address and telephone number.(ii)(I)The following disclosure statement in at least 18-point bold type and in the language in which a solicitation described by this paragraph is drafted: “THIS IS AN ADVERTISEMENT. YOU ARE NOT REQUIRED TO MAKE ANY PAYMENT OR TAKE ANY OTHER ACTION IN RESPONSE TO THIS OFFER.”(II)(ia)The disclosure statement described in subclause (I) shall appear in at least 16-point bold type on the front of an envelope that contains a solicitation described by this paragraph.(ib)This subclause applies only to solicitations made by physical mail.(B)For purposes of this paragraph:(i)“Consumer financial product or service” has the same meaning as defined in Section 90005 of the Financial Code.(ii)(I)“Covered person” has the same meaning as defined in Section 90005 of the Financial Code.(II)“Covered person” does not mean an entity exempt from Division 24 (commencing with Section 90000) of the Financial Code pursuant to Section 90002 of the Financial Code.(iii)“Solicitation” means an advertisement or marketing communication through writing or graphics that is directed to, or likely to give the impression of being directed to, an individually identified person, residence, or business location. “Solicitation” does not include any of the following:(I)Communication through a mass advertisement, including in a catalog, on a radio or television broadcast, or on a publicly accessible internet website, if that communication is not directed to, or is not likely to give the impression of being directed to, an individually identified person, residence, or business location.(II)Communication via a telephone, mail, or electronic communication that was initiated by a consumer.(III)A written credit or insurance solicitation that is subject to the disclosure requirements of subsection (d) of Section 1681m of Title 15 of the United States Code.(29)(A)Advertising, displaying, or offering a price for a good or service that does not include all mandatory fees or charges other than either of the following:(i)Taxes or fees imposed by a government on the transaction.(ii)Postage or carriage charges that will be reasonably and actually incurred to ship the physical good to the consumer.(B)Compliance by a person providing broadband internet access service on its own or as part of a bundle, as defined in Section 8.1(b) of Title 47 of the Code of Federal Regulations, with the broadband consumer label requirements adopted by the Federal Communications Commission in FCC 22-86 on November 14, 2022, codified in Section 8.1(a) of Title 47 of the Code of Federal Regulations, shall be deemed compliance with this paragraph.(C)(i)For purposes of this subparagraph, “financial entity” means an entity that is exempt from Division 24 (commencing with Section 90000) of the Financial Code pursuant to Section 90002 of the Financial Code.(ii)A financial entity that is required to provide disclosures in compliance with any of the following federal or state acts or regulations with respect to a financial transaction is exempt from this paragraph for purposes of that financial transaction:(I)The federal Truth in Savings Act, as amended (12 U.S.C. Sec. 4301 et seq.).(II)The federal Electronic Fund Transfer Act, as amended (15 U.S.C. Sec. 1693 et seq.).(III)Section 19 of the Federal Reserve Act, as amended (12 U.S.C. Sec. 461 et seq.).(IV)The federal Truth in Lending Act, as amended (15 U.S.C. Sec. 1601 et seq.).(V)The federal Real Estate Settlement Procedures Act, as amended (12 U.S.C. Sec. 2601 et seq.).(VI)The federal Home Ownership and Equity Protection Act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 1639).(VII)Any regulation adopted pursuant to any of the federal acts in subclauses (I) to (VI), inclusive.(VIII)The California Financing Law (Division 9 (commencing with Section 22000) of the Financial Code).(IX)The California Residential Mortgage Lending Act (Division 20 (commencing with Section 50000) of the Financial Code).(X)The Real Estate Law (Part 1 (commencing with Section 10000) of Division 4 of the Business and Professions Code).(XI)Any regulation adopted pursuant to any of the state acts in subclauses (VIII) to (X), inclusive.(D)(i)Subject to clause (ii), this paragraph does not apply to a mandatory fee or charge for individual food or beverage items sold directly to a customer by a restaurant, bar, food concession, grocery store, or grocery delivery service, or by means of a menu or contract for banquet or catering services that fully discloses the terms of service.(ii)A mandatory fee or charge under clause (i) shall be clearly and conspicuously displayed, with an explanation of its purpose, on any advertisement, menu, or other display that contains the price of the food or beverage item.(iii)“Grocery delivery service” means a company owned by, or under contract with, a grocery store or distributor that delivers food, primarily fresh produce, meat, poultry, fish, deli products, dairy products, perishable beverages, baked foods, and prepared foods, from the grocery store or distributor to a consumer.(iv)The exemption in this subparagraph does not apply to a “third-party food delivery platform,” as defined in Section 113930.5 of the Health and Safety Code, or any other food delivery platform.(b)(1)It is an unfair or deceptive act or practice for a mortgage broker or lender, directly or indirectly, to use a home improvement contractor to negotiate the terms of any loan that is secured, whether in whole or in part, by the residence of the borrower and that is used to finance a home improvement contract or any portion of a home improvement contract. For purposes of this subdivision, “mortgage broker or lender” includes a finance lender licensed pursuant to the California Financing Law (Division 9 (commencing with Section 22000) of the Financial Code), a residential mortgage lender licensed pursuant to the California Residential Mortgage Lending Act (Division 20 (commencing with Section 50000) of the Financial Code), or a real estate broker licensed under the Real Estate Law (Division 4 (commencing with Section 10000) of the Business and Professions Code).(2)This section shall not be construed to either authorize or prohibit a home improvement contractor from referring a consumer to a mortgage broker or lender by this subdivision. However, a home improvement contractor may refer a consumer to a mortgage lender or broker if that referral does not violate Section 7157 of the Business and Professions Code or any other law. A mortgage lender or broker may purchase an executed home improvement contract if that purchase does not violate Section 7157 of the Business and Professions Code or any other law. Nothing in this paragraph shall have any effect on the application of Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1801) of Title 2 to a home improvement transaction or the financing of a home improvement transaction.(c)As of July 1, 2025, any disclosure, advertisement, or notice that is required to be “clearly” or “clearly and conspicuously” made must have text that is “clear and conspicuous,” as defined in subdivision (u) of Section 1791.(d)This section shall become operative on July 1, 2024.